North Carolina statutes. Chapter 47. Probate and Registration.
Article 2. Registration.

§ 47-17.
Probate and registration sufficient without livery of seizin, etc.

All deeds, contracts or leases, before registration, except those executed prior to January 1, 1870, shall be acknowledged by the grantor, lessor or the person executing the same, or their signature proven on oath by one or more witnesses in the manner prescribed by law, and all deeds executed and registered according to law shall be valid, and pass title and estates without livery of seizin, attornment or other ceremony.

History.

29, Ch. II, c. 3; 1715, c. 7; 1756, c. 58, s. 3; 1838-9, c. 33; R.C., c. 37, s. 1; Code, s. 1245; 1885, c. 147, s. 3; 1905, c. 277; Rev., s. 979; C.S., s. 3308.

Cross References.

As to filing a false lien or encumbrance, see

G.S. 14-118.6

.

As to cure of obvious description errors in recorded instruments, see

G.S. 47-36.2

.

Local Modification.

(As to Article 2) Mitchell: 1987, c. 537.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Estoppel and Rebutter in North Carolina,” see 1 N.C.L. Rev. 153, 155 (1923).

For article, “North Carolina’s Real Estate Recording Laws: The Ghost of 1885,” see
28 N.C. Cent. L.J. 199 (2006).

§ 47-17.1.
Documents registered or ordered to be registered in certain counties to designate draftsman; exceptions.

The register of deeds of any county in North Carolina shall not accept for registration, nor shall any judge order registration pursuant to

G.S. 47-14

, of any deeds or deeds of trust, executed after January 1, 1980, unless the first page of the deeds or deeds of trust bears an entry showing the name of the drafter of the deed or deed of trust. The register of deeds shall not be required to verify or make inquiry concerning the capacity or authority of the person or entity shown as the drafter on the instrument.

History.

1953, c. 1160; 1955, cc. 54, 59, 87, 88, 264, 280, 410, 628, 655; 1957, cc. 431, 469, 932, 982, 1119, 1290; 1959, cc. 266, 312, 548, 589; 1961, cc. 789, 1167; 1965, cc. 160, 597, 830; 1967, cc. 42, 139; c. 639, s. 2; c. 658; 1969, c. 10; 1971, c. 46; 1973, cc. 65, 283, 342; 1979, c. 703; 1981, c. 362, ss. 1, 2; 2011-351, s. 3; 2018-80, s. 2.1; 2020-50, s. 3(a), (b); 2020-69, s. 6(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Alamance: 1957, c. 1290; Onslow: 1959, c. 783.

§ 47-17.2.
Assignments of mortgages, deeds of trust, or other agreements pledging real property as security.

It shall not be necessary in order to effect a valid assignment of a note and deed of trust, mortgage, or other agreement pledging real property or an interest in real property as security for an obligation, to record a written assignment in the office of the register of deeds in the county in which the real property is located. A transfer of the promissory note or other instrument secured by the deed of trust, mortgage, or other security interest that constitutes an effective assignment under the law of this State shall be an effective assignment of the deed of trust, mortgage, or other security instrument. The assignee of the note shall have the right to enforce all obligations contained in the promissory note or other agreement, and all the rights of the assignor in the deed of trust, mortgage, or other security instrument, including the right to substitute the trustee named in any deed of trust, and to exercise any power of sale contained in the instrument without restriction. The provisions of this section do not preclude the recordation of a written assignment of a deed of trust, mortgage, or other security instrument, with or without the promissory note or other instrument that it secures, provided that the assignment complies with applicable law.

History.

1993, c. 288, s. 4.

§ 47-18.
Conveyances, contracts to convey, options, and leases of land.

No (i) conveyance of land, (ii) contract to convey, (iii) option to purchase or convey, (iv) lease of land for more than three years, (v) right of first refusal, or (vi) right of first offer is valid to pass any property interest as against lien creditors or purchasers for a valuable consideration from the donor, bargainor, or lessor but from the time of its registration in the county where the land lies, or if the land is located in more than one county, then in each county where any portion of the land lies to be effective as to the land in that county. Unless otherwise stated either on the registered instrument or on a separate registered instrument duly executed by the party whose priority interest is adversely affected, (i) instruments registered in the office of the register of deeds have priority based on the order of registration as determined by the time of registration, and (ii) if instruments are registered simultaneously, then the instruments are presumed to have priority determined as follows:

The earliest document number set forth on the registered instrument.

The sequential book and page number set forth on the registered instrument if no document number is set forth on the registered instrument.The presumption created by this subsection is rebuttable.

This section shall not apply to contracts, leases or deeds executed prior to March 1, 1885, until January 1, 1886; and no purchase from any such donor, bargainor or lessor shall avail or pass title as against any unregistered deed executed prior to December 1, 1885, when the person holding or claiming under such unregistered deed shall be in actual possession and enjoyment of such land, either in person or by his tenant, at the time of the execution of such second deed, or when the person claiming under or taking such second deed had at the time of taking or purchasing under such deed actual or constructive notice of such unregistered deed, or the claim of the person holding or claiming thereunder.

History.

Code, s. 1245; 1885, c. 147, s. 1; Rev., s. 980; C.S., s. 3309; 1959, c. 90; 1975, c. 507; 2003-219, s. 2; 2005-212, s. 2; 2021-91, s. 10.

Cross References.

For statute of frauds with reference to contracts for sale of land, leases, etc., see

G.S. 22-2

.

§ 47-18.1.
Registration of certificate of corporate merger, consolidation, or conversion.

If title to real property in this State is vested by operation of law in another entity upon the merger, consolidation, or conversion of an entity, such vesting is effective against lien creditors or purchasers for a valuable consideration from the entity formerly owning the property, only from the time of registration of a certificate thereof as provided in this section, in the county where the land lies, or if the land is located in more than one county, then in each county where any portion of the land lies to be effective as to the land in that county.

The Secretary of State shall adopt uniform certificates of merger, consolidation, or conversion, to be furnished for registration, and shall adopt such fees as are necessary for the expense of such certification. If the entity involved is not a domestic entity, a similar certificate by any competent authority in the jurisdiction of incorporation or organization may be registered in accordance with this section.

A certificate of the Secretary of State prepared in accordance with this section shall be registered by the register of deeds in the same manner as deeds, and for the same fees, but no formalities as to acknowledgment, probate, or approval by any other officer shall be required. The name of the entity formerly owning the property shall appear in the “Grantor” index, and the name of the entity owning the property by virtue of the merger, consolidation, or conversion shall appear in the “Grantee” index.

History.

1967, c. 950, s. 3; 1991, c. 645, s. 2(b); 1999-369, s. 5.1.

§ 47-18.2.
Registration of Inheritance and Estate Tax Waiver.

An Inheritance and Estate Tax Waiver or other consent to transfer issued by the Secretary of Revenue bearing the signature of the Secretary of Revenue or the official facsimile signature of the Secretary of Revenue may be registered by the Register of Deeds in the county or counties where the real estate described in the Inheritance and Estate Tax Waiver or consent to transfer is located in the same manner as deeds, and for the same fees, but no formalities as to acknowledgement, probate, or approval by an officer shall be required. The name of the decedent owning the real property at death shall appear in the “Grantor” index. Nothing herein shall require a personal representative or other person interested in the decedent’s estate to register Inheritance and Estate Tax Waivers or consents to transfer.

History.

1987, c. 548, s. 3.

§ 47-18.3.
Execution of corporate instruments; authority and proof.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the bylaws or articles of incorporation or the operating agreement or articles of organization, when it appears on the face of an instrument registered in the office of the register of deeds that the instrument was signed in the ordinary course of business on behalf of a domestic or foreign corporation or a domestic or foreign limited liability company by its chairman, president, chief executive officer, a vice-president, assistant vice-president, treasurer, chief financial officer, chief operations officer, general counsel, deputy or assistant general counsel, manager, member, director, or other fiduciary duly authorized by the applicable business entity’s statutes or governing documents, such an instrument shall be as valid with respect to the rights of innocent third parties as if executed pursuant to authorization from the board of directors, unless the instrument reveals on its face a potential breach of fiduciary obligation. The subsection shall not apply to parties who had actual knowledge of lack of authority or of a breach of fiduciary obligation.

Any instrument registered in the office of the register of deeds, appearing on its face to be executed by a corporation or limited liability company, foreign or domestic, and bearing a seal which purports to be the corporate seal, setting forth the name of the corporation engraved, lithographed, printed, stamped, impressed upon, or otherwise affixed to the instrument, is prima facie evidence that the seal is the duly adopted corporate seal of the corporation, that it has been affixed as such by an individual duly authorized so to do, that the instrument was duly executed and signed by individuals who were officers or agents of the corporation acting by authority duly given by the board of directors, and that any such instrument is the act of the corporation, and shall be admissible in evidence without further proof of execution.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to exclude the power of any corporate or limited liability company representatives to bind the corporation or limited liability company pursuant to express, implied, inherent or apparent authority, ratification, estoppel, or otherwise.

Nothing in this section shall relieve corporate or limited liability company officers from liability to the corporation or limited liability company or from any other liability that they may have incurred from any violation of their actual authority.

Any corporation or limited liability company may convey an interest in real property which is transferable by instrument which is duly executed by either an officer, manager, member, or agent of said corporation or limited liability company and has attached thereto a signed and attested resolution of the board of directors of said corporation or the managers or members of the limited liability company authorizing the said officer, manager, member, or agent to execute, sign, seal, and attest deeds, conveyances, or other instruments. This section shall be deemed to have been complied with if an attested resolution is recorded separately in the office of the register of deeds in the county where the land lies, which said resolution shall be applicable to all deeds executed subsequently thereto and pursuant to its authority. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this section shall not require a signed and attested resolution of the board of directors of the corporation or the managers or members of the limited liability company to be attached to an instrument or separately recorded in the case of an instrument duly executed by the corporation’s or limited liability company’s chairman, president, chief executive officer, a vice-president, assistant vice-president, treasurer, chief financial officer, chief operations officer, general counsel, deputy or assistant general counsel, manager, member, director, or other fiduciary duly authorized by the applicable business entity’s statutes or governing documents. All deeds, conveyances, or other instruments which have been heretofore or shall be hereafter so executed shall, if otherwise sufficient, be valid and shall have the effect to pass the title to the real or personal property described therein.

History.

1991, c. 647, s. 2; 1999-221, s. 4; 2018-80, s. 2.2; 2020-50, s. 3(a); 2020-69, s. 6(a).

§ 47-19.
Unregistered deeds prior to January, 1920, registered on affidavit.

Any person holding any unregistered deed or claiming title thereunder, executed prior to the first day of January, 1920, may have the same registered without proof of the execution thereof by making an affidavit, before the officer having jurisdiction to take probate of such deed, that the grantor, bargainor or maker of such deed, and the witnesses thereto, are dead or cannot be found, that he cannot make proof of their handwriting, and that affiant believes such deed to be a bona fide deed and executed by the grantor therein named. Said affidavit shall be written upon or attached to such deed, and the same, together with such deed, shall be entitled to registration in the same manner and with the same effect as if proved in the manner prescribed by law for other deeds.

History.

1885, c. 147, s. 2; 1905, c. 277; Rev., s. 981; 1913, c. 116; 1915, cc. 13, 90; C.S., s. 3310; Ex. Sess., 1924, c. 56; 1951, c. 771.

§ 47-20.
Deeds of trust, mortgages, conditional sales contracts, assignments of leases and rents; effect of registration.

No deed of trust or mortgage of real or personal property, or of a leasehold interest or other chattel real, or conditional sales contract of personal property in which the title is retained by the vendor, shall be valid to pass any property as against lien creditors or purchasers for a valuable consideration from the grantor, mortgagor or conditional sales vendee, but from the time of registration thereof as provided in this Article; provided however that any transaction subject to the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code (Chapter 25 of the General Statutes) is controlled by the provisions of that act and not by this section. Unless otherwise stated either on the registered instrument or on a separate registered instrument duly executed by the party whose priority interest is adversely affected, (i) instruments registered in the office of the register of deeds shall have priority based on the order of registration as determined by the time of registration, and (ii) if instruments are registered simultaneously, then the instruments shall be presumed to have priority as determined by:

The earliest document number set forth on the registered instrument.

The sequential book and page number set forth on the registered instrument if no document number is set forth on the registered instrument.

The presumption created by this subsection is rebuttable.

For purposes of this section and

G.S. 47-20.1

, the following definitions apply:

“Rents, issues, or profits” means all amounts payable by or on behalf of any lessee, tenant, or other person having a possessory interest in real estate on account of or pursuant to any written or oral lease or other instrument evidencing a possessory interest in real property or pursuant to any form of tenancy implied by law, and all amounts payable by or on behalf of any licensee or permittee or other person occupying or using real property under license or permission from the owner or person entitled to possession. The term shall not include farm products as defined in G.S. 25-9-102(34), timber, the proceeds from the sale of farm products or timber, or the proceeds from the recovery or severance of any mineral deposits located on or under real property.

“Assignment of leases, rents, issues, or profits” means every document assigning, transferring, pledging, mortgaging, or conveying an interest in leases, licenses to real property, and rents, issues, or profits arising from real property, whether set forth in a separate instrument or contained in a mortgage, deed of trust, conditional sales contract, or other deed or instrument of conveyance.

“Collateral assignment” means any assignment of leases, rents, issues, or profits made and delivered in connection with the grant of any mortgage, or the execution of any conditional sales contract or deed of trust or in connection with any extension of credit made against the security of any interest in real property, where the assignor retains the right to collect or to apply such lease revenues, rents, issues, or profits after assignment and prior to default.

The recording of a written document in accordance with

G.S. 47-20.1

containing an assignment of leases, rents, issues, or profits arising from real property shall be valid and enforceable from the time of recording to pass the interest granted, pledged, assigned, or transferred as against the assignor, and shall be perfected from the time of recording against subsequent assignees, lien creditors, and purchasers for a valuable consideration from the assignor.

Where an assignment of leases, rents, issues, or profits is a collateral assignment, after a default under the mortgage, deed of trust, conditional sales contract, or evidence of indebtedness which such assignment secures, the assignee shall thereafter be entitled, but not required, to collect and receive any accrued and unpaid or subsequently accruing lease revenues, rents, issues, or profits subject to the assignment, without need for the appointment of a receiver, any act to take possession of the property, or any further demand on the assignor. Unless otherwise agreed, after default the assignee shall be entitled to notify the tenant or other obligor to make payment to him and shall also be entitled to take control of any proceeds to which he may be entitled. The assignee must proceed in a commercially reasonable manner and may deduct his reasonable expenses of realization from the collections.

This section shall not exclude other methods of creating, perfecting, collecting, sequestering, or enforcing a security interest in rents, issues, or profits provided by the law of this State.

History.

1829, c. 20; R.C., c. 37, s. 22; Code, s. 1254; Rev., s. 982; 1909, c. 874, s. 1; C.S., s. 3311; 1953, c. 1190, s. 1; 1959, c. 1026, s. 2; 1965, c. 700, s. 8; 1967, c. 562, s. 5; 1991, c. 234, s. 1; 2000-169, s. 35; 2003-219, s. 3; 2005-212, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to security interests in motor vehicles, see

G.S. 20-58

et seq.

As to perfection of security interests under the Uniform Commercial Code, see

G.S. 25-9-301

et seq.

As to filing of security interests under the Uniform Commercial Code, see

G.S. 25-9-401

et seq.

As to discharge of record of mortgagees and deeds of trust, see

G.S. 45-37

.

As to registration of conveyances, contracts to convey, options and leases of land, see

G.S. 47-18

.

As to insurance policies for benefit of mortgagees, see

G.S. 58-43-15

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-212, s. 3, effective July 20, 2005, rewrote subsection (a).

Legal Periodicals.

As to notice and registration, see 15 N.C.L. Rev. 166 (1937).

For comment on persons protected by this section, see 28 N.C.L. Rev. 305 (1950).

For comment on the 1953 amendatory act, see 31 N.C.L. Rev. 429 (1953).

For article, “Transferring North Carolina Real Estate Part I: How the Present System Functions,” see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 413 (1971).

For article, “Future Advances and Title Insurance Coverage,” see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 329 (1979).

For article, “North Carolina’s Real Estate Recording Laws: The Ghost of 1885,” see
28 N.C. Cent. L.J. 199 (2006).

§ 47-20.1.
Place of registration; real property.

To be validly registered pursuant to

G.S. 47-20

, a deed of trust or mortgage of real property must be registered in the county where the land lies, or if the land is located in more than one county, then the deed of trust or mortgage must be registered in each county where any portion of the land lies in order to be effective as to the land in that county.

History.

1953, c. 1190, s. 2.

§ 47-20.2.
Place of registration; personal property.

As used in this section:

“Mortgage” includes a deed of trust and a conditional sales contract; unless subject to the filing requirements of Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code (Chapter 25) and duly filed pursuant thereto;

“Mortgagor” includes a grantor in a deed of trust and a conditional sales vendee.

To be validly registered pursuant to

G.S. 47-20

, a mortgage of personal property must be registered as follows:

If the mortgagor is an individual:

Who resides in this State, the mortgage must be registered in the county where the mortgagor resides when the mortgage is executed.

Who resides outside this State, the mortgage must be registered in each county in this State where any of the tangible mortgaged property is located at the time the mortgage is executed, in order to be effective as to such property; and if any of the mortgaged property consists of a chose in action which arises out of the business transacted at a place of business operated by the mortgagor in this State, then the mortgage must be registered in the county where such place of business is located.

If the mortgagor is a partnership, either limited or unlimited:

Which has a principal place of business in this State, the mortgage must be registered in the county where such place of business is located at the time the mortgage is executed.

Which does not have a principal place of business in this State but has any place of business in this State, the mortgage must be registered in every county in this State where any such place of business is located at the time the mortgage is executed. Where such mortgage is registered in one or more of such counties but is not registered in every county required under this subsection, it shall, nevertheless, be effective as to the property in every county in which it is registered.

Which has no place of business in the State, the mortgage must be registered in every county in this State where a partner resides at the time the mortgage is executed. Where such mortgage is registered in one or more of such counties but is not registered in every county required under this subsection, it shall, nevertheless, be effective as to the property in every county in which it is registered.

Which has no place of business in this State, and no partner residing in this State, the mortgage must be registered in each county in this State where any of the mortgaged property is located when the mortgage is executed, in order to be effective as to the property in such county.

If the mortgagor is a domestic corporation:

Which has a registered office in this State, the mortgage must be registered in the county where such registered office is located when the mortgage is executed.

Which having been formed prior to July 1, 1957, has no such registered office but does have a principal office in this State as shown by its certificate of incorporation, or amendment thereto, or legislative charter, the mortgage must be registered in the county where the principal office is said to be located by such certificate of incorporation, or amendment thereto, or legislative charter when the mortgage is executed.

If the mortgagor is a foreign corporation:

Which has a registered office in this State, the mortgage must be registered in the county where such registered office is located when the mortgage is executed.

Which, having been domesticated prior to July 1, 1957, has no such registered office in this State, but does have a principal office in this State, the mortgage must be registered in the county where the principal office is said to be located by the statement filed with the Secretary of State in its application for permission to do business in this State or other document filed with the Secretary of State showing the location of such principal office in this State when the mortgage is executed.

Which has not been domesticated in this State, the mortgage must be registered in the same county or counties as a mortgage executed by a nonresident individual.

If the personal property concerned is a vehicle required to be registered under the motor vehicle laws of the State of North Carolina, then the provisions of this section shall not apply but the security interest arising from the deed of trust, mortgage, conditional sales contract, or lease intended as security of such vehicle may be perfected by recordation in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 20-58

through 20-58.10.

History.

1953, c. 1190, s. 2; 1957, c. 979, ss. 1, 2; 1961, c. 835, s. 12; 1965, c. 700, s. 8.

Cross References.

As to perfection of security interests in vehicles requiring certificates of title, see

G.S. 20-58

et seq.

As to filing of security interests in personal property under the Uniform Commercial Code, see

G.S. 25-9-401

.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on this section, see 31 N.C.L. Rev. 429 (1953).

For 1984 survey, “The Application of the North Carolina Motor Vehicle Act and the Uniform Commercial Code to the Sale of Motor Vehicles by Consignment,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1105 (1985).

§ 47-20.3.
Place of registration; instruments covering both personal property and real property.

To be validly registered pursuant to

G.S. 47-20

, a mortgage, deed of trust or conditional sales contract, or any combination of these, of both personal property and real property must be registered pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 47-20.1

for the real property covered by the instrument and pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 47-20.2

for the personal property covered by the instrument, and in each case the registration must be indexed in the records designated for the particular type of property involved.

History.

1953, c. 1190, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to filing of security interests under the Uniform Commercial Code, see

G.S. 25-9-401

.

§ 47-20.4.
Place of registration; chattel real.

To be validly registered pursuant to

G.S. 47-20

, a deed of trust or mortgage of a leasehold interest or other chattel real must be registered in the county where the land involved lies, or if the land involved is located in more than one county, then the deed of trust or mortgage must be registered in each county where any portion of the land involved lies in order to be effective as to the land in that county.

History.

1959, c. 1026, s. 1.

§ 47-20.5.
Real property; effectiveness of after-acquired property clause.

As used in this section, “after-acquired property clause” means any provision or provisions in an instrument which create a security interest in real property acquired by the grantor of the instrument subsequent to its execution.

As used in this section, “after-acquired property,” and “property subsequently acquired” mean any real property which the grantor of a security instrument containing an after-acquired property clause acquires subsequent to the execution of such instrument, and in which the terms of the after-acquired property clause would create a security interest.

An after-acquired property clause is effective to pass after-acquired property as between the parties to the instrument containing such clause, but shall not be effective to pass title to after-acquired property as against lien creditors or purchasers for a valuable consideration from the grantor of the instrument unless and until such instrument has been registered or reregistered at or subsequent to the time such after-acquired property is acquired by such grantor and the deed to the grantor of the after-acquired property is registered.

In lieu of reregistering the instrument containing the after-acquired property clause as specified in subsection (c), such instrument may be made effective to pass title to after-acquired property as against lien creditors and purchasers for a valuable consideration from the grantor of the instrument by registering a notice of extension as specified in subsection (e) at or subsequent to the time of acquisition of the after-acquired property by the grantor.

The notice of extension shall

Show that effective registration of the after-acquired property clause is extended,

Include the names of the parties to the instrument containing the after-acquired property clause,

Refer to the book and page where the instrument containing the after-acquired property clause is registered, and

Be signed by the grantee or the person secured by the instrument containing the after-acquired property clause or his successor in interest.

The register of deeds shall index the notice of extension in the same manner as the instrument containing the after-acquired property clause.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, no instrument which has been heretofore executed or registered and which contains an after-acquired property clause shall be effective to pass title to after-acquired property as against lien creditors or purchasers for a valuable consideration from the grantor of such instrument unless and until such instrument or a notice of extension thereof has been registered or reregistered as herein provided.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section with respect to registration, reregistration and registration of notice of extension, an after-acquired property clause in an instrument which creates a security interest made by a public utility as defined in G.S. 62-3(23) or a natural gas company as defined in section 2(6) of the Natural Gas Act, 15 U.S.C.A. 717a(6), or by an electric or telephone membership corporation incorporated or domesticated in North Carolina shall be effective to pass after-acquired property as against lien creditors or purchasers for a valuable consideration from the grantor of the instrument from the time of original registration of such instrument.

History.

1967, c. 861, s. 1; 1969, c. 813, ss. 1-3; 1997-386, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the effectiveness of after-acquired property clauses in this State, see 6 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 378 (1970).

§ 47-20.6.
Affidavit for permanent attachment of titled manufactured home to real property.

If the owner of real property or the owner of the manufactured home who has entered into a lease with a primary term of at least 20 years for the real property on which the manufactured home is affixed has surrendered the title to a manufactured home that is placed on the real property and the title has been cancelled by the Division of Motor Vehicles under

G.S. 20-109.2

, the owner, or the secured party having the first security interest in the manufactured home at time of surrender, shall record the affidavit described in

G.S. 20-109.2

with the office of the register of deeds of the county where the real property is located. Upon recordation, the affidavit shall be indexed on the grantor index in the name of the owner of the manufactured home and on the grantee index in the name of the secured party or lienholder, if any.

After the affidavit is recorded, the manufactured home becomes an improvement to real property. Any lien on the manufactured home shall be perfected and given priority in the manner provided for a lien on real property.

Following recordation of the affidavit, all existing liens on the real property are considered to include the manufactured home. Thereafter, no conveyance of any interest, lien, or encumbrance shall attach to the manufactured home, unless the interest, lien, or encumbrance is applicable to the real property on which the home is located and is recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the real property is located in accordance with the applicable sections of this Chapter.

The provisions of this section control over the provisions of

G.S. 25-9-334

relating to the priority of a security interest in fixtures, as applied to manufactured homes.

History.

2001-506, s. 3; 2003-400, s. 2.

§ 47-20.7.
Declaration of intent to affix manufactured home; transfer of real property with manufactured home attached.

A person who owns real property on which a manufactured home has been or will be placed or the owner of a manufactured home who has entered into a lease with a primary term of at least 20 years for the real property on which the manufactured home has been or will be placed, as defined in G.S. 105-273(13), and either where the manufactured home has never been titled by the Division of Motor Vehicles or where the title to the manufactured home has been surrendered and cancelled by the Division prior to January 1, 2002, may record in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the real property is located a declaration of intent to affix the manufactured home to the property and may convey or encumber the real property, including the manufactured home, by a deed, deed of trust, or other instrument recorded in the office of the register of deeds.

The declaration of intent, deed, deed of trust, or other instrument shall contain a description of the manufactured home, including the name of the manufacturer, the model name, if applicable, the serial number, and a statement of the owner’s intention that the manufactured home be treated as property.

On or after the filing of the instrument with the office of the register of deeds pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the manufactured home placed, or to be placed, on the property becomes an improvement to real property. Any lien on the manufactured home shall be perfected and have priority in the manner provided for a lien on real property.

The provisions of this section control over the provisions of

G.S. 25-9-334

relating to the priority of a security interest in fixtures, as applied to manufactured homes.

History.

2001-506, s. 3; 2003-400, s. 3.

§ 47-21.
Blank or master forms of mortgages, etc.; embodiment by reference in instruments later filed.

It shall be lawful for any person, firm or corporation to have a blank or master form of mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument conveying an interest in, or creating a lien on, real and/or personal property, filed, indexed and recorded in the office of the register of deeds. When any such blank or master form is filed, the register of deeds shall record it and shall index it in the manner now provided by law for the indexing of instruments recorded in the office of the register of deeds, except that the name of the person, firm or corporation whose name appears on such blank or master form shall be inserted in the indices as grantor and also as grantee. The fee for filing, recording and indexing such blank or master form shall be that for recording instruments in general, as provided in G.S. 161-10(a)(1).

When any deed, mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument conveying an interest in, or creating a lien on, real and/or personal property, refers to the provisions, terms, covenants, conditions, obligations, or powers set forth in any such blank or master form recorded as herein authorized, and states the office of recordation of such blank or master form, book and page where same is recorded such reference shall be equivalent to setting forth in extenso in such deed, mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument conveying an interest in, or creating a lien on, real and/or personal property, the provisions, terms, covenants, conditions, obligations and powers set forth in such blank or master form. Provided this section shall not apply to Alleghany, Ashe, Avery, Beaufort, Bladen, Camden, Carteret, Chowan, Cleveland, Columbus, Dare, Gates, Granville, Guilford, Halifax, Iredell, Jackson, Martin, Moore, Perquimans, Sampson, Stanly, Swain, Transylvania, Vance, Washington and Watauga Counties.

History.

1935, c. 153; 1971, c. 156; 2001-390, s. 4.

Legal Periodicals.

For a discussion of this section, see 13 N.C.L. Rev. 395 (1935).

For an article on rules, ethics and reform in connection with transferring North Carolina real estate, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 593 (1971).

§ 47-22.
Counties may provide for photographic or photostatic registration.

The board of county commissioners of any county is hereby authorized and empowered to provide for photographic or photostatic recording of all instruments filed in the office of the register of deeds and in other offices of such county where said board may deem such recording feasible. The board of county commissioners may also provide for filing such copies of said instruments in loose-leaf binders.

History.

1941, c. 286; 1971, c. 1185, s. 12.

§ 47-23.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1953, c. 1190, s. 3.

§ 47-24.
Conditional sales or leases of railroad property.

When any railroad equipment and rolling stock is sold, leased or loaned on the condition that the title to the same, notwithstanding the possession and use of the same by the vendee, lessee, or bailee, shall remain in the vendor, lessor or bailor until the terms of the contract, as to the payment of the installments, amounts or rentals payable, or the performance of other obligations thereunder, shall have been fully complied with, such contract shall be invalid as to any subsequent judgment creditor, or any subsequent purchaser for a valuable consideration without notice, unless —

The same is evidenced by writing duly acknowledged before some person authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds.

Such writing is registered as mortgages are registered, in the office of the register of deeds in at least one county in which such vendee, lessee or bailee does business.

Each locomotive or car so sold, leased or loaned has the name of the vendor, lessor, or bailor, or the assignee of such vendor, lessor or bailor plainly marked upon both sides thereof, followed by the word owner, lessor, bailor or assignee as the case may be.

This section shall not apply to or invalidate any contract made before the twelfth day of March, 1883.

History.

1883, c. 416; Code, s. 2006; Rev., s. 984; 1907, c. 150, s. 1; C.S., s. 3313.

§ 47-25.
Marriage settlements.

All marriage settlements and other marriage contracts, whereby any money or other estate is secured to the wife or husband, shall be proved or acknowledged and registered in the same manner as deeds for lands, and shall be valid against creditors and purchasers for value only from registration.

History.

1785, c. 238; R.C., c. 37, ss. 24, 25; 1871-2, c. 193, s. 12; Code, ss. 1269, 1270, 1281; 1885, c. 147; Rev., s. 985; C.S., s. 3314.

§ 47-26.
Deeds of gift.

All deeds of gift of any estate of any nature shall within two years after the making thereof be proved in due form and registered, or otherwise shall be void, and shall be good against creditors and purchasers for value only from the time of registration.

History.

1789, c. 315, s. 2; R.C., c. 37, s. 18; Code, s. 1252; 1885, c. 147; Rev., s. 986; C.S., s. 3315.

Legal Periodicals.

For article discussing the doctrine of color of title in North Carolina, see 13 N.C. Cent. L.J. 123 (1982).